Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1542
Manufacturer, defined.

Manufacturer shall mean any person engaged in a business activity who has annual gross proceeds in this state of at least one hundred thousand dollars resulting from the sale of tangible personal property which the person has made, produced, manufactured, processed, or fabricated which is within any of the categories listed in section 81-1560.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 9;

Laws 1981, LB 253, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 203, § 4.
October 30, 2020